Florida, session 2026, SB1586.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 71 72 Section 1.âSubsections (2) and (4) of section 365.171, 73 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 74 365.171âEmergency communications state plan.â 75 (2)âLEGISLATIVE INTENT.âIt is the intent of the Legislature 76 that the communications number â911â be the designated emergency 77 communications number. A public safety agency may not advertise 78 or otherwise promote the use of any communications number for 79 emergency response services other than â911.â It is further the 80 intent of the Legislature to implement and continually update a 81 cohesive statewide emergency communications plan for enhanced 82 911 services which will provide citizens with rapid direct 83 access to public safety agencies by accessing â911â with the 84 objective of reducing the response time to situations requiring 85 law enforcement, fire, medical, rescue, and other emergency 86 services. It is further the intent of the Legislature to create 87 a unified 911 system within each county or region to serve as a 88 single point of contact for all emergency services in order to 89 maximize efficiency of emergency services. It is further the 90 intent of the Legislature to prohibit the transfer of calls 91 between 911 call centers or other law enforcement, fire, or EMS 92 dispatch centers in the same county, to maximize the efficiency 93 of the statewide emergency communications plan for residents 94 dialing â911â for emergency services. It is further the intent 95 of the Legislature to maximize interoperability of public safety 96 agencies within each county and statewide to maximize the 97 efficiency of emergency communications for residents dialing 98 â911â for emergency services. The goal of interoperability is to 99 ensure that 911 calls for emergency services, as well as 100 communication and responses to catastrophic events, are 101 connected directly so that critical information and resources 102 across multiple disciplines and agencies are coordinated. 103 (4)âSTATE PLAN.âThe office shall develop, maintain, and 104 implement appropriate modifications for a statewide emergency 105 communications plan. The plan shall provide for: 106 (a)âThe public agency emergency communications requirements 107 for each entity of local government in the state. 108 (b)âA system to meet specific local government 109 requirements. Such system shall include law enforcement, 110 firefighting, and emergency medical services and may include 111 other emergency services such as poison control, suicide 112 prevention, and emergency management services. 113 (c)âIdentification of the mutual aid agreements necessary 114 to obtain an effective emergency communications system. 115 (d)âA funding provision that identifies the cost necessary 116 to implement the emergency communications system. 117 (e)1.a.âBy January 1, 2029, each county, and every public 118 agency within such county, shall provide 911, emergency call, 119 and dispatch services from a unified 911 call center, operated 120 by the county or a regional entity created by an interlocal 121 agreement or other memorandum of agreement, decided by a 122 unanimous vote of the Emergency Communication Center (ECC) 123 executive board or the Regional Emergency Communication Center 124 (RECC) executive board, as applicable, pursuant to this 125 paragraph. 126 b.âUpon establishment of a unified 911 call center, all 127 state funds for emergency services must be redirected to each 128 county that operates the unified 911 call center. A county that 129 provides or receives 911, emergency call, and dispatch services, 130 but does not establish a unified 911 call center pursuant to 131 this paragraph, may not receive state funds for emergency 132 services. 133 2.a.âWithin 90 days after July 1, 2026, in order for a 134 county to establish a unified 911 call center pursuant to this 135 paragraph, the board of county commissioners shall convene an 136 ECC executive board. The chair of the board of county 137 commissioners or his or her designee shall serve as the chair of 138 the ECC executive board. The membership of the ECC executive 139 board shall be composed of the city manager or strong mayor, as 140 applicable, of the largest municipality in each county by 141 population size that provides law enforcement, fire, and EMS 142 services, and each agency head that provides law enforcement, 143 fire, and EMS services operating in the county as of July 1, 144 2026. 145 b.âBy January 1, 2027, the ECC executive board shall decide 146 by a unanimous vote the entity for the county which will operate 147 its unified 911 call center. Funding for such entity must also 148 be decided by a unanimous vote of the ECC executive board, and 149 the funding must be provided by the county and participating 150 municipalities and agencies or any combination thereof. Any 151 funding after the establishment of a unified 911 call center 152 required by this paragraph may not exceed any net increase in 153 the annual purchasing power of the dollar, as reflected in the 154 Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, unless agreed to 155 by a unanimous vote of the ECC executive board. 156 3.a.âWithin 90 days after July 1, 2026, in order for a 157 county to establish a regional unified 911 call center pursuant 158 to this paragraph, the board of county commissioners of the 159 county with the largest population participating in the regional 160 unified 911 call center shall convene an RECC executive board. 161 The chair of the board of county commissioners or his or her 162 designee shall serve as the chair of the RECC executive board. 163 The membership of the RECC executive board shall be composed of: 164 (I)âThe chair of the board of county commissioners, or his 165 or her designee, from each participating county. 166 (II)âThe city manager or strong mayor, as applicable, of 167 the largest municipality in each participating county by 168 population size. 169 (III)âEvery agency head within each participating county 170 that provides law enforcement, fire, and EMS services operating 171 in the participating counties as of July 1, 2026. 172 173 Notwithstanding membership requirements in this sub 174 subparagraph, RECC executive board responsibilities and 175 requirements must mirror the ECC executive board 176 responsibilities and requirements pursuant to this paragraph. 177 b.âBy January 1, 2027, the RECC executive board shall 178 decide by a unanimous vote the entity for the region which will 179 operate its unified 911 call center for the participating 180 counties. Funding for such entity must also be decided by a 181 unanimous vote of the RECC executive board, and the funding must 182 be provided by the participating counties, municipalities, 183 agencies, or any combination thereof. Any funding after the 184 establishment of a unified 911 call center required by this 185 paragraph may not exceed any net increase in the annual 186 purchasing power of the dollar, as reflected in the Consumer 187 Price Index for All Urban Consumers, unless agreed to by three 188 fourths vote of the RECC executive board. 189 4.âA county that has an established entity that, as of July 190 1, 2026, provides law enforcement, fire, and EMS services to all 191 government-provided first responder agencies in the county shall 192 convene an ECC executive board pursuant to subparagraph 2. to 193 ensure that the requirements of this paragraph are met. 194 5.a.âFollowing the establishment of a unified 911 call 195 center by a county pursuant to this paragraph, the ECC executive 196 board shall serve as an advisor to the entity that operates the 197 unified 911 call center. The ECC executive board may convene at 198 a time and place as determined by the chair of the board. 199 Membership of the ECC executive board shall be composed of: 200 (I)âOne member of the board of county commissioners or his 201 or her designee. 202 (II)âOne representative from the countyâs city council, or 203 his or her designee. 204 (III)âThe sheriff or his or her designee. 205 (IV)âThe police chief and the fire chief of the county. 206 207 Members may serve on a rotating basis within their respective 208 category of representation as established by the implementing 209 rules created by the ECC executive board. 210 b.âFollowing the establishment of a regional unified 911 211 call center pursuant to this paragraph, the RECC executive board 212 shall serve as an advisor to the entity that operates the 213 regional unified 911 call center. The RECC executive board may 214 convene at a time and place as determined by the chair of the 215 board. Membership of the RECC executive board shall be composed 216 of: 217 (I)âOne member of the board of county commissioners, or his 218 or her designee, from each participating county. 219 (II)âOne representative, or his or her designee, from the 220 city council of each participating county. 221 (III)âThe sheriff, or his or her designee, from each 222 participating county. 223 (IV)âThe police chief and the fire chief from each 224 participating county. 225 226 Members may serve on a rotating basis within their respective 227 category of representation as established by the implementing 228 rules created by the RECC executive board. 229 6.a.âAn entity that operates a unified 911 call center 230 shall maintain its headquarters in one location to serve as the 231 primary public safety answering point (PSAP). However, an entity 232 may maintain offices or answering points at various other 233 locations throughout this state, as required and determined by a 234 public agency. An entity shall designate an alternate center to 235 the PSAP. Such center may only receive emergency calls when the 236 PSAP is unable to receive emergency calls. 237 b.âAn entity that operates a regional unified 911 call 238 center shall maintain its headquarters in one location to serve 239 as the PSAP, but may maintain offices or answering points at 240 various locations, as required and determined by the public 241 agencies. However, the entity shall designate an alternate 242 center to the PSAP. Such center may only receive emergency calls 243 when the PSAP is unable to receive emergency calls. 244 7.a.âBy January 1, 2027, if a county has not established 245 the operation of a unified 911 call center pursuant to this 246 paragraph, the sheriff of the county is deemed the entity to 247 provide 911, emergency call, and dispatch services in the 248 county. All existing 911 operations within a county must be 249 integrated under the sheriff to create a 911 call center, and 250 every public agency within the county shall participate in the 251 911 call center to provide such services. 252 b.âIf the sheriff provides 911, emergency call, and 253 dispatch services, the state funds for emergency services must 254 be redirected to the sheriff for the sole purpose of operating 255 the unified 911 call center and may not be distributed to the 256 county. The county shall provide total funding for the 911 call 257 center, as determined by the annual needs assessment and as 258 requested by the sheriff, but the county does not have rights or 259 control over the funds or equipment of the center. Expenditures 260 for operating the 911 call center may not be included in the 261 sheriffâs budget under s. 30.49. Such expenditures must be 262 included in the countyâs budget in accordance with chapter 129. 263 8.a.âAn entity or a regional entity that provides 911, 264 emergency call, and dispatch services from a 911 call center may 265 not transfer any emergency call received by the entity to any 266 other PSAP or call center, unless at least one firefighting, law 267 enforcement, ambulance, medical, or other emergency services 268 professional, as applicable, has been dispatched in response to 269 the emergency call received by the entity. 270 b.âThis subparagraph does not prohibit the transfer of an 271 emergency call to another PSAP or emergency communications 272 center if the reported emergency occurs outside the 273 jurisdictional boundaries of the local government where the 274 headquarters of the 911 call center is located. In such cases, 275 the emergency call must be promptly transferred to the 276 appropriate jurisdiction, consistent with established 277 interagency protocols and mutual-aid agreements. 278 9.a.âAn entity or a regional entity that provides 911, 279 emergency call, and dispatch services from a 911 call center 280 shall maintain interoperability with other emergency 281 communications centers in this state. Such entities shall 282 maintain proactive cybersecurity standards adopted by the 283 National Institute of Standards and Technology, as outlined in 284 the Task Force on Optimal Public Safety Answering Point 285 Architecture Guidelines. Such entities shall also maintain 286 cryptographic inventory and ongoing cryptographic monitoring 287 services, and incorporate behavioral-based, packet-level 288 monitoring at all times from a security operations center 289 located in the United States. 290 b.âTo aid in interoperability and public safety, a vendor 291 of computer-aided dispatch (CAD) systems and interoperable radio 292 communications systems must provide, at no additional cost, the 293 built-in capability to interface with different PSAP CAD systems 294 and other radio communications systems that, although not 295 operated or maintained by the vendor, are used in this state by 296 911 call centers. In addition, a vendor may not impose any 297 additional licensing or integration fee for any system that 298 enables integration of such systems, including, but not limited 299 to, radio communications systems, CAD systems, cyber security 300 systems, telephone communication systems, interoperability 301 gateway systems, and Radio-over-Internet Protocol (RoIP) gateway 302 systems, used in this state by a 911 call center. 303 c.âEvery 911 call center and PSAP, and any related system, 304 including, but not limited to, interoperability gateway systems 305 and secure IP communications systems that enable cross-system 306 radio communications, are deemed critical infrastructure in this 307 state. 308 d.âAs used in this subparagraph, the term: 309 (I)ââCritical infrastructureâ has the same meaning as in s. 310 119.0725(1). 311 (II)ââInteroperabilityâ means the technical ability to 312 communicate across disciplines and jurisdictions statewide. 313 (III)ââInteroperability gatewayâ system means a network 314 device or platform that provides protocol translation, audio 315 transcoding, routing, and talk-group management between 316 otherwise incompatible radio systems, Voice-over-Internet 317 Protocol (VoIP) systems, public safety LTE network systems, 318 mission critical push-to-X services systems, satellite systems, 319 and IP-based communications systems. 320 (IV)ââRadio-over-Internet Protocol (RoIP) Gatewayâ system 321 means hardware or software that enables radio communications to 322 be transmitted, received, patched, or controlled across IP 323 networks. 324 10.a.âBy January 1, 2027, and by January 1, 2029, the chair 325 of the ECC executive board, the chair of the RECC executive 326 board, or the sheriff, as applicable, shall certify in writing 327 to the office that the county or each participating county, as 328 applicable, has taken the required action to comply this 329 paragraph and has established an entity or a regional entity to 330 provide 911, emergency call, and dispatch services. 331 b.âBy January 30, 2027, and by January 1, 2029, the office 332 shall submit a report to the Governor, the President of the 333 Senate, and the Speaker of House of Representatives, describing 334 the results of establishing 911 call centers in this state, 335 identifying any county that has not established such a center in 336 violation of this paragraph. 337 11.âA county that does not comply with this paragraph by 338 January 1, 2029, will have its emergency funding reduced by 25 339 percent for each year the county does not comply. 340 341 The office shall be responsible for the implementation and 342 coordination of such plan. The office shall adopt any necessary 343 rules and schedules related to public agencies for implementing 344 and coordinating the plan, pursuant to chapter 120. 345 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.